Utah statutes.
53A-1-908.   Cost evaluation of federal education agreements.
(1)  Before legally binding the state to a federal education agreement that
may cost the state a total of $500,000 or more to implement, a school official
shall estimate the state and local cost of implementing the federal education
agreement and submit that cost estimate to the governor and the Executive
Appropriations Committee of the Legislature.
(2)  The Executive Appropriations Committee may:
(a)  direct its staff to make an independent cost estimate of the cost of
implementing the federal education agreement; and
(b)  affirmatively adopt a cost estimate as the benchmark for determining
which authorizations established by this part are necessary.
